Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “cost to raise a child” means the amount a family
will spend per child as estimated in the most recent United States Department of Agriculture
report on Expenditures on Children by Families, adjusted for inflation.
(2) Not later than July  1 of each even-numbered year, the Department of Human Services
shall report to the  relevant interim committees of the Legislative Assembly and the Joint
Interim Committee on Ways and Means about compensation to individuals who maintain a
foster home or to child caring agencies that authorize proctor foster homes. The report must
include, at a minimum, information about each of the following as  measured on April 1 of
the reporting year:
(a) The total number of certified foster homes serving children.
(b) The total number of child-specific foster homes serving children.
(c) The total number of general foster homes serving children.
(d) The total number of proctor foster homes serving children.
(e) The total number of foster homes  and the total number of foster homes approved to
serve children but without any current placement.
(f) The total number of children served in proctor or certified foster homes.
(g) The current payment methodology for  services provided by proctor foster parents and
by certified foster parents, including but not limited to:
(A) The base payment rate.
(B) Any enhanced rates.
(C) Any reimbursements for mileage, childcare or respite.
(h) The date and percentage of the last certified foster care or proctor  foster care rate
increase.
(i) An explanation of what percentage of the cost to  raise a child is represented by the
current base rate for certified foster care and proctor foster  care, disaggregated by age
group.
(j) An estimate of  the General Fund cost to raise the base rate for certified and proctor
foster care to 90 percent and 100  percent of the cost to raise a child, disaggregated by age
group.
(k) The current base rate  for certified and proctor foster care in Washington, Idaho,
California, Nevada and Utah.
Enrolled Senate Bill 741 (SB 741-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. The Department of Human Services shall submit the first report under
section 1 of this 2025 Act no later than July 1, 2026.
Passed by Senate April 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 741 (SB 741-A) Page 2